data/hyphy_genes.txt
A1BG
A1CF
A2M
A2ML1
A3GALT2
A4GALT
A4GNT
AAAS
AACS
AADAC
AADACL2
AADACL3
AADACL4
AADAT
AAGAB
AAK1
AAMDC
AAMP
AANAT
AAR2
AARD
AARS
AARS2
AARSD1
AASDH
AASDHPPT
AASS
AATF
AATK
ABAT
ABCA1
ABCA10
ABCA12
ABCA13
ABCA2
ABCA3
ABCA4
ABCA5
ABCA6
ABCA7
ABCA8
ABCA9
ABCB1
ABCB10
ABCB11
ABCB4
ABCB5
ABCB6
ABCB7
ABCB8
ABCB9
ABCC1
ABCC10
ABCC11
ABCC12
ABCC2
ABCC3
ABCC4
ABCC5
ABCC6
ABCC8
ABCC9
ABCD1
ABCD2
ABCD3
ABCD4
ABCE1
ABCF1
ABCF2
ABCF2-H2BE1
ABCF3
ABCG1
ABCG2
ABCG4
ABCG5
ABCG8
ABHD1
ABHD10
ABHD11
ABHD12
ABHD12B
ABHD13
ABHD14A
ABHD14A-ACY1
ABHD14B
ABHD15
ABHD16A
ABHD16B
ABHD17A
ABHD17B
ABHD17C
ABHD18
ABHD2
ABHD3
ABHD4
ABHD5
ABHD6
ABHD8
ABI1
ABI2
ABI3
ABI3BP
ABITRAM
ABL1
ABL2
ABLIM1
ABLIM2
ABLIM3
ABO
ABR
ABRA
ABRACL
ABRAXAS1
ABRAXAS2
ABT1
ABTB1
ABTB2
AC000093.1
AC000095.3
AC000120.2
AC000120.3
AC001226.2
AC002094.3
AC002310.4
AC002985.1
AC002996.1
AC003002.1
AC003002.2
AC003002.3
AC003005.1
AC003006.1
AC003688.1
AC004076.1
AC004080.3
AC004223.3
AC004556.3
AC004593.3
AC004687.2
AC004691.2
AC004706.3
AC004805.1
AC004832.3
AC004922.1
AC004997.1
AC005020.2
AC005041.1
AC005154.5
AC005258.1
AC005324.3
AC005324.4
AC005520.1
AC005551.1
AC005670.2
AC005697.1
AC005702.1
AC005726.1
AC005832.4
AC005833.1
AC005837.2
AC005943.1
AC006030.1
AC006059.2
AC006064.6
AC006254.1
AC006486.1
AC006538.2
AC006978.2
AC007040.2
AC007192.1
AC007244.1
AC007325.1
AC007325.2
AC007325.4
AC007326.4
AC007375.2
AC007731.4
AC007846.2
AC007906.2
AC007998.2
AC008012.1
AC008073.3
AC008162.2
AC008397.1
AC008397.2
AC008403.1
AC008481.3
AC008537.1
AC008575.1
AC008581.2
AC008676.3
AC008687.1
AC008687.4
AC008687.8
AC008695.1
AC008750.8
AC008758.1
AC008758.5
AC008758.6
AC008763.2
AC008763.3
AC008764.1
AC008764.4
AC008770.1
AC008770.2
AC008770.4
AC008878.1
AC008878.2
AC008878.3
AC008982.1
AC009070.1
AC009133.6
AC009163.3
AC009163.5
AC009412.1
AC009690.1
AC009690.3
AC009779.3
AC009879.2
AC009879.3
AC010132.3
AC010197.2
AC010255.3
AC010319.2
AC010323.1
AC010325.1
AC010326.2
AC010327.2
AC010422.3
AC010422.5
AC010422.6
AC010422.8
AC010463.1
AC010522.1
AC010531.1
AC010542.3
AC010547.4
AC010615.4
AC010616.1
AC010619.1
AC010646.1
AC011005.1
AC011043.1
AC011043.2
AC011195.2
AC011330.3
AC011448.1
AC011452.1
AC011455.2
AC011462.1
AC011473.4
AC011479.1
AC011498.4
AC011499.1
AC011511.1
AC011511.4
AC011530.1
AC011604.2
AC011841.1
AC012184.2
AC012213.5
AC012254.2
AC012309.1
AC012488.2
AC012531.3
AC012651.1
AC013271.1
AC013394.1
AC013470.2
AC013489.1
AC013717.1
AC015688.4
AC015802.6
AC015813.2
AC015871.1
AC017083.3
AC018362.3
AC018512.1
AC018523.2
AC018630.2
AC018709.1
AC018755.2
AC019117.3
AC019257.8
AC020636.2
AC020907.6
AC020909.1
AC020915.4
AC020922.1
AC021072.1
AC021087.5
AC021097.2
AC021660.3
AC022137.3
AC022335.1
AC022384.1
AC022400.5
AC022414.1
AC022415.2
AC022506.1
AC022826.2
AC023055.1
AC023490.5
AC023491.2
AC024558.2
AC024592.3
AC025165.3
AC025165.6
AC025263.2
AC025283.2
AC025287.4
AC026316.4
AC026464.1
AC026464.3
AC026464.4
AC026464.6
AC026740.3
AC026786.1
AC026954.2
AC027644.4
AC027796.3
AC034102.2
AC034228.4
AC036214.3
AC037459.1
AC040162.1
AC046185.1
AC048338.1
AC048338.2
AC053503.7
AC055811.2
AC055839.2
AC058822.1
AC064853.2
AC067752.1
AC067968.1
AC068234.1
AC068533.4
AC068547.1
AC068580.4
AC068631.2
AC068775.1
AC068831.7
AC068896.1
AC068946.1
AC068946.2
AC069257.3
AC069288.1
AC069368.1
AC069444.2
AC069503.2
AC072022.2
AC073082.1
AC073283.3
AC073508.2
AC073585.2
AC073610.2
AC073612.1
AC073896.1
AC074143.1
AC078927.1
AC079447.1
AC079594.2
AC083800.1
AC083977.1
AC084121.11
AC084121.12
AC084121.13
AC084121.5
AC084121.6
AC084121.7
AC084121.8
AC084121.9
AC084337.2
AC087289.3
AC087498.1
AC087632.2
AC087721.2
AC090004.1
AC090227.2
AC090360.1
AC090517.4
AC090527.2
AC091057.6
AC091167.2
AC091167.6
AC091167.7
AC091551.1
AC091959.3
AC092017.3
AC092042.3
AC092073.1
AC092111.3
AC092143.1
AC092329.3
AC092442.1
AC092587.1
AC092647.5
AC092718.3
AC092718.8
AC092835.1
AC093155.3
AC093227.2
AC093323.1
AC093423.3
AC093512.2
AC093525.1
AC093525.2
AC093668.1
AC093827.5
AC093884.1
AC093899.2
AC096887.1
AC097104.1
AC097625.2
AC097634.4
AC097636.2
AC097637.1
AC098484.3
AC098582.1
AC098588.2
AC098650.1
AC098850.3
AC099489.1
AC099811.2
AC099850.2
AC100868.1
AC104109.3
AC104304.2
AC104389.5
AC104389.6
AC104452.1
AC104472.3
AC104532.1
AC104581.2
AC105052.1
AC105052.3
AC106741.1
AC106774.4
AC106886.5
AC107871.1
AC107959.5
AC108488.2
AC108941.2
AC109583.1
AC110275.1
AC112128.1
AC112229.3
AC112504.2
AC113189.9
AC113348.1
AC113348.2
AC113554.1
AC114490.2
AC114490.3
AC115220.1
AC116366.3
AC117378.1
AC117457.1
AC118470.1
AC118549.1
AC118553.2
AC119396.1
AC119674.2
AC119676.1
AC120057.2
AC120114.4
AC124312.1
AC126283.2
AC127029.3
AC129492.3
AC131160.1
AC132217.2
AC133551.1
AC134669.1
AC134684.11
AC134684.8
AC134684.9
AC134980.3
AC135050.2
AC135068.1
AC135068.2
AC135068.3
AC135068.8
AC135178.3
AC136352.2
AC136352.3
AC136428.1
AC136612.1
AC136616.1
AC136616.2
AC136616.3
AC137834.1
AC138647.1
AC138696.1
AC138811.2
AC138894.1
AC138969.1
AC139491.7
AC139530.2
AC140504.1
AC141272.1
AC142391.1
AC144573.1
AC145212.1
AC171558.1
AC171558.3
AC187653.1
AC211486.6
AC211486.7
AC211486.8
AC213203.1
AC213203.2
AC231656.1
AC231657.3
AC233723.1
AC233755.1
AC233755.2
AC233992.2
AC235565.2
AC236972.4
AC240274.1
AC242842.3
AC243547.3
AC243967.1
AC244197.3
AC244517.10
AC245033.1
AC245748.1
AC253536.7
AC253572.1
ACAA1
ACAA2
ACACA
ACACB
ACAD10
ACAD11
ACAD8
ACAD9
ACADL
ACADM
ACADS
ACADSB
ACADVL
ACAN
ACAP1
ACAP2
ACAP3
ACAT1
ACAT2
ACBD3
ACBD4
ACBD5
ACBD6
ACBD7
ACCS
ACCSL
ACD
ACE
ACE2
ACER1
ACER2
ACER3
ACHE
ACIN1
ACKR1
ACKR2
ACKR3
ACKR4
ACLY
ACMSD
ACO1
ACO2
ACOD1
ACOT1
ACOT11
ACOT12
ACOT13
ACOT2
ACOT4
ACOT6
ACOT7
ACOT8
ACOT9
ACOX1
ACOX2
ACOX3
ACOXL
ACP1
ACP2
ACP4
ACP5
ACP6
ACP7
ACPP
ACR
ACRBP
ACRV1
ACSBG1
ACSBG2
ACSF2
ACSF3
ACSL1
ACSL3
ACSL4
ACSL5
ACSL6
ACSM1
ACSM2A
ACSM2B
ACSM3
ACSM4
ACSM5
ACSM6
ACSS1
ACSS2
ACSS3
ACTA1
ACTA2
ACTB
ACTBL2
ACTC1
ACTG1
ACTG2
ACTL10
ACTL6A
ACTL6B
ACTL7A
ACTL7B
ACTL8
ACTL9
ACTN1
ACTN2
ACTN3
ACTN4
ACTR10
ACTR1A
ACTR1B
ACTR2
ACTR3
ACTR3B
ACTR3C
ACTR5
ACTR6
ACTR8
ACTRT1
ACTRT2
ACTRT3
ACVR1
ACVR1B
ACVR1C
ACVR2A
ACVR2B
ACVRL1
ACY1
ACY3
ACYP1
ACYP2
AD000671.1
AD000671.2
ADA
ADA2
ADAD1
ADAD2
ADAL
ADAM10
ADAM11
ADAM12
ADAM15
ADAM17
ADAM18
ADAM19
ADAM2
ADAM20
ADAM21
ADAM22
ADAM23
ADAM28
ADAM29
ADAM30
ADAM32
ADAM33
ADAM7
ADAM8
ADAM9
ADAMDEC1
ADAMTS1
ADAMTS10
ADAMTS12
ADAMTS13
ADAMTS14
ADAMTS15
ADAMTS16
ADAMTS17
ADAMTS18
ADAMTS19
ADAMTS2
ADAMTS20
ADAMTS3
ADAMTS4
ADAMTS5
ADAMTS6
ADAMTS7
ADAMTS8
ADAMTS9
ADAMTSL1
ADAMTSL2
ADAMTSL3
ADAMTSL4
ADAMTSL5
ADAP1
ADAP2
ADARB1
ADARB2
ADAT1
ADAT2
ADAT3
ADCK1
ADCK2
ADCK5
ADCY1
ADCY10
ADCY2
ADCY3
ADCY4
ADCY5
ADCY6
ADCY7
ADCY8
ADCY9
ADCYAP1
ADCYAP1R1
ADD1
ADD2
ADD3
ADGB
ADGRA1
ADGRA2
ADGRA3
ADGRB1
ADGRB2
ADGRB3
ADGRD1
ADGRD2
ADGRE1
ADGRE2
ADGRE3
ADGRE5
ADGRF1
ADGRF2
ADGRF3
ADGRF4
ADGRF5
ADGRG1
ADGRG2
ADGRG3
ADGRG4
ADGRG5
ADGRG6
ADGRG7
ADGRL1
ADGRL2
ADGRL3
ADGRL4
ADGRV1
ADH1A
ADH1B
ADH1C
ADH4
ADH5
ADH6
ADH7
ADHFE1
ADI1
ADIG
ADIPOQ
ADIPOR1
ADIPOR2
ADIRF
ADK
ADM
ADM2
ADM5
ADNP
ADNP2
ADO
ADORA1
ADORA2A
ADORA2B
ADORA3
ADPGK
ADPRH
ADPRHL1
ADPRHL2
ADPRM
ADRA1A
ADRA1B
ADRA1D
ADRA2A
ADRA2B
ADRA2C
ADRB1
ADRB2
ADRB3
ADRM1
ADSL
ADSS
ADSSL1
ADTRP
AEBP1
AEBP2
AEN
AF196969.1
AF241726.2
AFAP1
AFAP1L1
AFAP1L2
AFDN
AFF1
AFF2
AFF3
AFF4
AFG1L
AFG3L2
AFM
AFMID
AFP
AFTPH
AGA
AGAP1
AGAP2
AGAP3
AGAP4
AGAP5
AGAP6
AGAP9
AGBL1
AGBL2
AGBL3
AGBL4
AGBL5
AGER
AGFG1
AGFG2
AGGF1
AGK
AGL
AGMAT
AGMO
AGO1
AGO2
AGO3
AGO4
AGPAT1
AGPAT2
AGPAT3
AGPAT4
AGPAT5
AGPS
AGR2
AGR3
AGRN
AGRP
AGT
AGTPBP1
AGTR1
AGTR2
AGTRAP
AGXT
AGXT2
AHCTF1
AHCY
AHCYL1
AHCYL2
AHDC1
AHI1
AHNAK
AHNAK2
AHR
AHRR
AHSA1
AHSG
AHSP
AICDA
AIDA
AIF1
AIF1L
AIFM1
AIFM2
AIFM3
AIG1
AIM2
AIMP1
AIMP2
AIP
AIPL1
AIRE
AJAP1
AJM1
AJUBA
AK1
AK2
AK3
AK4
AK5
AK6
AK7
AK9
AKAIN1
AKAP1
AKAP10
AKAP11
AKAP12
AKAP13
AKAP14
AKAP17A,
AKAP3
AKAP4
AKAP5
AKAP6
AKAP7
AKAP8
AKAP8L
AKAP9
AKIP1
AKIRIN1
AKIRIN2
AKNA
AKNAD1
AKR1A1
AKR1B1
AKR1B10
AKR1B15
AKR1C1
AKR1C2
AKR1C3
AKR1C4
AKR1C8P
AKR1E2
AKR7A2
AKR7A3
AKR7L
AKT1
AKT1S1
AKT2
AKT3
AKTIP
AL020996.2
AL021546.1
AL021997.3
AL022238.4
AL022312.1
AL022318.4
AL024498.2
AL031315.1
AL031681.2
AL031708.1
AL031777.3
AL031847.2
AL032819.3
AL033529.1
AL034430.1
AL034430.2
AL035078.4
AL035425.2
AL035460.1
AL035461.3
AL049629.2
AL049634.2
AL049650.1
AL049697.1
AL049779.1
AL049839.2
AL049844.1
AL049844.3
AL096711.2
AL096814.1
AL096814.2
AL109810.2
AL109811.3
AL109827.1
AL110118.2
AL117339.5
AL117348.2
AL121578.2
AL121594.1
AL121753.1
AL121758.1
AL121845.2
AL121845.3
AL121899.2
AL121900.2
AL132671.2
AL132780.3
AL133352.1
AL133353.2
AL133410.3
AL133500.1
AL135905.2
AL136295.1
AL136295.3
AL136295.4
AL136295.5
AL136454.1
AL136531.2
AL138752.2
AL138899.3
AL139011.2
AL139142.2
AL139260.3
AL139300.1
AL139353.1
AL157392.5
AL157935.2
AL159163.1
AL160269.1
AL160272.2
AL162231.1
AL162231.3
AL162377.3
AL162417.1
AL162596.1
AL163195.3
AL163636.2
AL353572.3
AL353579.1
AL353588.1
AL354761.1
AL354822.1
AL355102.2
AL355312.6
AL355315.1
AL355916.3
AL355987.1
AL355987.3
AL357075.5
AL357673.1
AL358075.4
AL358113.1
AL358472.6
AL358472.7
AL359736.1
AL359922.1
AL360181.3
AL365205.1
AL365214.3
AL365232.1
AL365273.2
AL391650.1
AL391987.1
AL391987.2
AL441992.2
AL445238.1
AL445423.3
AL445524.2
AL445685.3
AL445989.1
AL451007.3
AL451062.3
AL451136.1
AL512428.1
AL512506.3
AL512785.2
AL513128.2
AL513165.2
AL583836.1
AL589666.1
AL590132.1
AL590560.2
AL590764.2
AL591806.4
AL592183.1
AL592490.1
AL603764.2
AL603832.3
AL627230.1
AL627230.3
AL645922.1
AL645941.2
AL662884.4
AL662899.1
AL662899.2
AL669918.1
AL672142.1
AL691442.1
AL713999.1
AL772284.2
AL807752.6
AL807752.7
AL845331.2
AL928654.3
AL929554.1
ALAD
ALAS1
ALAS2
ALB
ALCAM
ALDH16A1
ALDH18A1
ALDH1A1
ALDH1A2
ALDH1A3
ALDH1B1
ALDH1L1
ALDH1L2
ALDH2
ALDH3A1
ALDH3A2
ALDH3B1
ALDH3B2
ALDH4A1
ALDH5A1
ALDH6A1
ALDH7A1
ALDH8A1
ALDH9A1
ALDOA
ALDOB
ALDOC
ALG1
ALG10
ALG10B
ALG11
ALG12
ALG13
ALG14
ALG1L
ALG1L2
ALG2
ALG3
ALG5
ALG6
ALG8
ALG9
ALK
ALKAL1
ALKAL2
ALKBH1
ALKBH2
ALKBH3
ALKBH4
ALKBH5
ALKBH6
ALKBH7
ALKBH8
ALLC
ALMS1
ALOX12
ALOX12B
ALOX15
ALOX15B
ALOX5
ALOX5AP
ALOXE3
ALPG
ALPI
ALPK1
ALPK2
ALPK3
ALPL
ALPP
ALS2
ALS2CL
ALX1
ALX3
ALX4
ALYREF
AMACR
AMBN
AMBP
AMBRA1
AMD1
AMDHD1
AMDHD2
AMELX
AMELY
AMER1
AMER2
AMER3
AMFR
AMH
AMHR2
AMIGO1
AMIGO2
AMIGO3
AMMECR1
AMMECR1L
AMN
AMN1
AMOT
AMOTL1
AMOTL2
AMPD1
AMPD2
AMPD3
AMPH
AMT
AMTN
AMY1A
AMY1B
AMY1C
AMY2A
AMY2B
AMZ1
AMZ2
ANAPC1
ANAPC10
ANAPC11
ANAPC13
ANAPC15
ANAPC16
ANAPC2
ANAPC4
ANAPC5
ANAPC7
ANG
ANGEL1
ANGEL2
ANGPT1
ANGPT2
ANGPT4
ANGPTL1
ANGPTL2
ANGPTL3
ANGPTL4
ANGPTL5
ANGPTL6
ANGPTL7
ANGPTL8
ANHX
ANK1
ANK2
ANK3
ANKAR
ANKDD1A
ANKDD1B
ANKEF1
ANKFN1
ANKFY1
ANKH
ANKHD1
ANKHD1-EIF4EBP3
ANKIB1
ANKK1
ANKLE1
ANKLE2
ANKMY1
ANKMY2
ANKRA2
ANKRD1
ANKRD10
ANKRD11
ANKRD12
ANKRD13A
ANKRD13B
ANKRD13C
ANKRD13D
ANKRD16
ANKRD17
ANKRD18A
ANKRD18B
ANKRD2
ANKRD20A1
ANKRD20A2
ANKRD20A3
ANKRD20A4
ANKRD22
ANKRD23
ANKRD24
ANKRD26
ANKRD27
ANKRD28
ANKRD29
ANKRD30A
ANKRD30B
ANKRD30BL
ANKRD31
ANKRD33
ANKRD33B
ANKRD34A
ANKRD34B
ANKRD34C
ANKRD35
ANKRD36
ANKRD36B
ANKRD36C
ANKRD37
ANKRD39
ANKRD40
ANKRD40CL
ANKRD42
ANKRD44
ANKRD45
ANKRD46
ANKRD49
ANKRD50
ANKRD52
ANKRD53
ANKRD54
ANKRD55
ANKRD6
ANKRD60
ANKRD61
ANKRD62
ANKRD63
ANKRD65
ANKRD66
ANKRD7
ANKRD9
ANKS1A
ANKS1B
ANKS3
ANKS4B
ANKS6
ANKUB1
ANKZF1
ANLN
ANO1
ANO10
ANO2
ANO3
ANO4
ANO5
ANO6
ANO7
ANO8
ANO9
ANOS1
ANP32A
ANP32B
ANP32D
ANP32E
ANPEP
ANTKMT
ANTXR1
ANTXR2
ANTXRL
ANXA1
ANXA10
ANXA11
ANXA13
ANXA2
ANXA2R
ANXA3
ANXA5
ANXA6
ANXA7
ANXA8
ANXA8L1
ANXA9
AOAH
AOC1
AOC2
AOC3
AOPEP
AOX1
AP000295.1
AP000311.1
AP000350.4
AP000471.1
AP000552.4
AP000646.1
AP000721.1
AP000781.2
AP000812.4
AP000812.5
AP000944.5
AP001267.5
AP001273.2
AP001453.3
AP001458.2
AP001781.2
AP001931.1
AP002373.1
AP002495.1
AP002512.3
AP002748.5
AP002884.2
AP002990.1
AP003071.5
AP003108.2
AP003419.1
AP1AR
AP1B1
AP1G1
AP1G2
AP1M1
AP1M2
AP1S1
AP1S2
AP1S3
AP2A1
AP2A2
AP2B1
AP2M1
AP2S1
AP3B1
AP3B2
AP3D1
AP3M1
AP3M2
AP3S1
AP3S2
AP4B1
AP4E1
AP4M1
AP4S1
AP5B1
AP5M1
AP5S1
AP5Z1
APAF1
APBA1
APBA2
APBA3
APBB1
APBB1IP
APBB2
APBB3
APC
APC2
APCDD1
APCDD1L
APCS
APEH
APELA
APEX1
APEX2
APH1A
APH1B
API5
APIP
APLF
APLN
APLNR
APLP1
APLP2
APMAP
APOA1
APOA2
APOA4
APOA5
APOB
APOBEC1
APOBEC2
